Texas, session 892, HB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 92.054, Property Code, is amended by adding Subsections (d) and (e) to read as follows: (d)  If the rental premises become unusable for residential purposes as a result of a casualty loss caused by the negligence or fault of the landlord, the landlord: (1)  if comparable rental premises owned by the landlord are available for occupancy, shall allow the tenant to move to the premises for the remainder of the tenant's lease; or (2)  if rental premises owned by the landlord are not available, shall: (A)  locate comparable rental premises; and (B)  be liable to the tenant for the amount of the rent for the comparable rental premises that exceeds the amount of rent the tenant pays to the landlord under the tenant's lease for the remainder of the tenant's lease. (e)  The duties of a landlord under Subsection (d) are in addition to any other duties of a landlord or remedies of a tenant under this subchapter. SECTION 2.  Section 92.054(d), Property Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a lease that is entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.